Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-706
Annual appropriation bill; contents.

The city council of a city of the second class and the village board of trustees shall adopt a budget statement pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act, to be termed "The Annual Appropriation Bill", in which the city or village may appropriate such sums of money as may be deemed necessary to defray all necessary expenses and liabilities of such municipality.

Laws 1879, § 86, p. 225;

R.S.1913, § 5184;

C.S.1922, § 4371;

C.S.1929, § 17-569;

R.S.1943, § 17-706;

Laws 1967, c. 78, § 2, p. 249;

Laws 1972, LB 1423, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 26;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 219.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.

Contract by city council for repairing and rebuilding city hall involving sum in excess of that authorized by vote of people is void. Moore v. City of Central City, 118 Neb. 326, 224 N.W. 690 (1929).

Where proposition to issue bonds to fund indebtedness incurred without appropriation therefor is approved by majority of voters, action of city authorities is ratified and indebtedness is validated. State ex rel. City of Tekamah v. Marsh, 108 Neb. 835, 189 N.W. 381 (1922).

This section does not apply to borrowed money on hand for a specific purpose, sanctioned by majority of the legal voters, as such sanction is an appropriation. State ex rel. Fuller v. Martin, 27 Neb. 441, 43 N.W. 244 (1889).